Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7701
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-7701 to 71-7711 shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Facility-Provider Cooperation Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 111.